Utah statutes.
77-17-9.   Separation or sequestration of jurors -- Oath of officer having custody.

(1) The court, at any time before the submission of the case to the jury, may permit the jury to separate or order that it be sequestered in charge of a proper officer.

(2)  If the jury is sequestered the officer shall be sworn to keep the jurors together until the next meeting of the court, to prevent any person from speaking or communicating with them, and not to do so himself on any subject connected with the trial, and to return the jury to the court pursuant to its order.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

